Delaware, session 153, HB138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 4101, Title 21 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 4101. Provisions refer to vehicles upon highways; exceptions; powers of local authorities. (d) Liability for failure of owner to comply with traffic light signals. (13) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, the Department of Transportation must install and operate a traffic light signal violation monitoring system at an intersection requested by a member of the General Assembly within 60 days of the memberâs request.